Tennessee, session 114, SB1252.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-5102(a)(1), is amended by
deleting "Teachers and employees of public schools and LEAs" and substituting instead
"Teachers, employees, and students of public schools and LEAs".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-5102(a)(1), is amended by
deleting "work" and substituting instead "work or school".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-5102(a)(2), is amended by
deleting "teachers and employees of public schools and LEAs" and substituting instead
"teachers, employees, and students of public schools and LEAs".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-5102(a)(3), is amended by
deleting "teachers and employees" and substituting instead "teachers, employees, and
students".
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-5102(a)(4), is amended by
deleting "teacher or employee" wherever it appears and substituting instead "teacher,
employee, or student".
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-5102(b), is amended by
deleting "A teacher or other employee of a public school or LEA" and substituting instead "A
teacher, employee, or student of a public school or LEA".
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-5102(b)(1), is amended by
deleting "a student's preferred pronoun" and substituting instead "the preferred pronoun of a
SB1252
003379
- 1 -

teacher, school employee, or student", deleting "the student" and substituting instead "the
teacher, school employee, or student", and deleting "the student's" and substituting instead "the
biological sex of the teacher, school employee, or student".
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-5102(b)(2), is amended by
adding the language "under the laws of this state" after the language "Civilly liable", deleting
"the student" and substituting instead "a teacher, school employee, or student", deleting
"teacher or employee" and substituting instead "teacher, school employee, or student", and
deleting "student's preferred pronoun" and substituting instead "preferred pronoun of the
teacher, school employee, or student".
SECTION 9. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-5102(b)(3), is amended by
deleting "employment action" and substituting instead "employment or disciplinary action",
deleting "a student's preferred pronoun" and substituting instead "the preferred pronoun of a
teacher, school employee, or student", deleting "student's" wherever it appears in the
subdivision, and adding the following language after "biological sex":
of the teacher, school employee, or student
SECTION 10. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-5102(c), is amended by
adding the language "under the laws of this state" after the language "civilly liable", deleting
"teacher or employee of the public school or LEA" and substituting instead "teacher, employee,
or student of the public school or LEA", deleting "a student" and substituting instead "a teacher,
school employee, or student", deleting "the student" and substituting instead "the teacher,
school employee, or student", deleting "the teacher or employee" and substituting instead "the
teacher, school employee, or student", deleting "student's", and adding the following language
after "preferred pronoun":
of the teacher, school employee, or student
SECTION 11. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 003379